Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB162.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) (1) Beginning in school year 2025-2026, each board of
education of a school district shall provide up to one hour of seizure
recognition and related first aid training to every employee of such school
district who works in a school building that has a student who has a
seizure disorder enrolled in such school.
(2) The training required by this subsection shall be consistent with
training programs and guidelines developed by a nationally-recognized
organization focused on epilepsy and include, but not be limited to,
instruction in recognizing the signs and symptoms of seizures, responding
to such signs and symptoms with appropriate steps and administering
seizure medications. Such training may include online information or
materials.
(b) The school nurse assigned to the school where training is required
or the school administrator in the absence of a school nurse shall
coordinate the provision of epilepsy and seizure disorder care at such
school and ensure that all school employees are trained as required by this
section in each school year a student with a seizure disorder is enrolled at
such school.
(c) (1) Before seizure rescue medication may be administered to a
student to treat seizure disorder symptoms, the student's parent shall:
(A) Collaborate with appropriate school personnel and the student's
healthcare provider to create a seizure action plan;
(B) provide the school with written authorization to administer the
medication at school;
(C) provide a written statement from the student's healthcare provider
that contains the following information:
(i) The student's name;
(ii) the name and purpose of the medication;
(iii) the prescribed dosage;
(iv) the route of administration;

SB 162 2
(v) the frequency that the medication may be administered; and
(vi) the circumstances under which the medication may be
administered.
(2) The written authorization, written statement and seizure action
plan shall be kept on file in the office of the school nurse or school
administrator.
(3) The written authorization for the administration of seizure rescue
medication shall be effective for the school year in which it is granted and
may be renewed each succeeding school year upon satisfaction of the
requirements of this subsection.
(4) The seizure action plan shall be updated at the start of each school
year and when there are any changes in the health status of a student.
(d) No cause of action may be brought for any loss or damage caused
by any act or omission resulting from the implementation of this section or
resulting from any training or lack of training required by this section.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose any specific duty of
care.
(e) The state board of education may adopt rules and regulations to
implement the provisions of this section.
(f) As used in this section:
(1) "Parent" means a parent, legal guardian, custodian or other person
who has authority to act on behalf of a child.
(2) "Seizure action plan" means a written, individualized health plan
designed to acknowledge and prepare for the healthcare needs of a student
diagnosed with a seizure disorder.
(3) "Student" means a student enrolled in a school of a school district
who has been diagnosed with epilepsy or other seizure disorder and has
seizure rescue medication or other medication prescribed to treat seizure
disorder symptoms.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.